Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB622.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.7(b), (d), (e) and (h) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended to read:Section 635.7. Billing.--* * *[(b) An insurer must reimburse a nonnetwork EMS agency under the following:(1) The EMS agency has submitted a completed standardized form to the department requesting nonnetwork direct 12345678910111213141516171819202122 reimbursement from an insurer an EMS agency has identified. The form must be submitted to the department annually by October 15. The form shall declare the EMS agency's intention to receive direct payment from an insurer identified on the form for the next calendar year. The department shall develop a standardized form, using an EMS agency's assigned license number, to be used by an EMS agency that meets the conditions established under this section. The department shall develop and maintain a publicly accessible electronic registry that indicates which EMS agency has requested nonnetwork direct reimbursement from an insurer identified on the form.(2) An EMS agency has provided notification to the insurer upon submitting a claim for reimbursement that the EMS agency is registered with the department to receive direct reimbursement as provided for under this section.]* * *[(d) Where an insurer has reimbursed a nonnetwork EMS agency at the same rate it has established for a network EMS agency, the EMS agency may not bill the insured directly or indirectly or otherwise attempt to collect from the insured for the service provided, except for a billing to recover a copayment, coinsurance or deductible as specified in the health insurance policy.(e) An EMS agency that submits a form under this section may solicit donations or memberships or conduct fundraising, except that an EMS agency may not promise, suggest or infer to donors that a donation will result in the donor not being billed directly for any payment as provided under this section. Notwithstanding this paragraph, an EMS agency may bill in accordance with subsection (d). A violation of this section 20250SB0622PN0633 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be considered a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the "Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law."]* * *(h) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Department." Department of Health of the Commonwealth.]"EMS agency." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Emergency medical services." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Insurer." As follows:(1) An entity that is responsible for providing or paying for all or part of the cost of emergency medical services covered by an insurance policy, contract or plan. The term includes an entity subject to:(i) section 630, Article XXIV or any other provision of this act;(ii) the act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act; or(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include an entity that is responsible for providing or paying under an insurance policy, contract or plan which meets any of the following:(i) Is a homeowner's insurance policy.(ii) Provides any of the following types of insurance:(A) Accident only.20250SB0622PN0633 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Fixed indemnity.(C) Limited benefit.(D) Credit.(E) Dental.(F) Vision.(G) Specified disease.(H) Medicare supplement.(I) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(J) Long-term care.(K) Disability income.(L) Workers' compensation.(M) Automobile medical payment insurance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0622PN0633 - 4 - 1234567891011121314